Washington statutes.
RCW 18.35.060

Interim permit—Issuance.

The department, upon approval by the board, shall issue an interim permit authorizing an applicant for speech-language pathologist licensure or audiologist licensure who, except for the postgraduate professional experience and the examination requirements, meets the academic and practicum requirements of RCW 18.35.040(2) to practice under supervision. The interim permit is valid for a period of one year from date of issuance. The board shall determine conditions for the interim permit.

[ 2005 c 45 s 3; 2002 c 310 s 6; 1998 c 142 s 4; 1997 c 275 s 3. Prior: 1996 c 200 s 7; 1996 c 191 s 19; 1993 c 313 s 3; 1991 c 3 s 82; 1985 c 7 s 31; 1983 c 39 s 6; 1975 1st ex.s. c 30 s 37; 1973 1st ex.s. c 106 s 6.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2002 c 310: See note following RCW 18.35.010.

Effective date—1998 c 142 ss 1-14 and 16-20: See note following RCW 18.35.010.